Utah statutes.
20A-4-503.   Abetting forgery or alteration.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to willfully aid or abet in the commission
of any of the offenses defined in this part.
(2)  Each person who violates this section may be sentenced to imprisonment in
the state prison for a period not exceeding two years.
